Maryland, session 2025, SB0006.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–901.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the Board of Trustees of the Maryland Veterans Trust.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0006*

SENATE BILL 6
(c) “Department” means the Department of Veterans and Military Families.
(D) “OMBUDSMAN” MEANS THE VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES
OMBUDSMAN.
[(d)] (E) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Veterans and Military Families.
[(e)] (F) “Trust” means the Maryland Veterans Trust.
[(f)] (G) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, “veteran” means an
individual who served on active duty in the armed forces of the United States, other than
for training, and was discharged or released under conditions other than dishonorable.
PART IX. VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES OMBUDSMAN.
9–960.
(A) THERE IS A VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES OMBUDSMAN IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE OMBUDSMAN IS TO SERVE AS A RESOURCE TO
PROVIDE INFORMATION AND SUPPORT TO VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES
REGARDING THEIR RIGHTS AND ACCESS TO SERVICES.
9–961.
(A) (1) THE SECRETARY SHALL APPOINT THE OMBUDSMAN.
(2) THE OMBUDSMAN SERVES FOR A TERM OF 5 YEARS.
(3) THE SECRETARY MAY REMOVE THE OMBUDSMAN FOR CAUSE.
(B) SALARIES OF THE OMBUDSMAN AND STAFF UNDER THE OMBUDSMAN
AND EXPENSES RELATED TO THE OPERATION OF THE TOLL–FREE NUMBER
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–963 OF THIS PART, RENT, EQUIPMENT, SUPPLIES, AND
GENERAL OPERATIONS SHALL BE AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(C) (1) IN COOPERATION WITH THE SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND
MANAGEMENT, AND SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
SECRETARY SHALL SET MINIMUM SALARY, QUALIFICATIONS, AND EXPERIENCE
STANDARDS FOR THE OMBUDSMAN AND ANY STAFF UNDER THE OMBUDSMAN.
(2) THE OMBUDSMAN SHALL BE A VETERAN.

SENATE BILL 6 3
9–962.
(A) THE OMBUDSMAN SHALL:
(1) SERVE AS A SOURCE OF KNOWLEDGE ON THE STATE AND FEDERAL
LAWS, RULES, AND REGULATIONS GOVERNING VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES;
(2) PROVIDE IMPARTIAL INFORMATION TO VETERANS AND MILITARY
FAMILIES ON HOW TO NAVIGATE THE PROCESS OF OBTAINING SERVICES;
(3) EXPLAIN TO VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES THEIR RIGHTS
AND HOW THEY MAY AVAIL THEMSELVES OF THOSE RIGHTS;
(4) WORK NEUTRALLY WITH THE DEPARTMENT AND OTHER
ENTITIES, INCLUDING PRIVATE ORGANIZATIONS, TO ENSURE THAT SERVICES FOR
VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES ARE PROVIDED AS INTENDED;
(5) ADVOCATE ON BEHALF OF VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES;
(6) COMMUNICATE WITH THE PUBLIC ABOUT THE NEEDS OF
VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES;
(7) IDENTIFY ANY PATTERNS OF COMPLAINTS MADE BY VETERANS
AND MILITARY FAMILIES AND INFORM THE DEPARTMENT ABOUT ANY PATTERN; AND
(8) SERVE AS A GENERAL RESOURCE FOR VETERANS AND MILITARY
FAMILIES AND MAKE REFERRALS TO AVAILABLE STATE AND FEDERAL SERVICES
AND PROGRAMS FOR VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES.
(B) IN PERFORMING THE DUTIES ASSIGNED UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
OMBUDSMAN SHALL TREAT ALL COMMUNICATIONS AS CONFIDENTIAL AND MAY
REVEAL THE DETAILS OF ANY COMMUNICATION ONLY IF:
(1) NECESSARY TO ACHIEVE THE OMBUDSMAN’S DUTIES; AND
(2) DONE IN ACCORDANCE WITH APPLICABLE STATE AND FEDERAL
LAW.
9–963.
THE OMBUDSMAN SHALL ARRANGE FOR A TOLL–FREE TELEPHONE NUMBER,
AVAILABLE IN ENGLISH AS WELL AS OTHER APPROPRIATE LANGUAGES, TO ASSIST

SENATE BILL 6
ANY INDIVIDUAL SEEKING INFORMATION OR ADVICE ABOUT SERVICES AND
PROGRAMS AVAILABLE TO VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES.
9–964.
ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, AND EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER, THE
OMBUDSMAN SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT INCLUDES:
(1) THE NUMBER AND TYPE OF CALLS RECEIVED ON THE TOLL–FREE
NUMBER DURING THE PREVIOUS YEAR;
(2) ANY PATTERNS OF COMPLAINTS MADE BY VETERANS AND
MILITARY FAMILIES IDENTIFIED UNDER § 9–962(A)(7) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(3) A SUMMARY OF THE SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE OMBUDSMAN
DURING THE PREVIOUS YEAR; AND
(4) ANY RECOMMENDATIONS THE OMBUDSMAN DETERMINES ARE
APPROPRIATE AND NECESSARY CONCERNING THE STATE’S PROVISION OF SERVICES
AND PROGRAMS FOR VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.